Maryland, session 2025, HB1536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, there shall be a 60–day tax– and
fee–free period, beginning on the effective date of this Act, during which all State taxes and
fees imposed on or paid by customers of residential and commercial electric and gas utilities
for those utilities are suspended, including any tax or fee imposed under:
(1) §§ 8–402, 8–402.1, 11–102, and 11–1A–02 of the Tax – General Article;
and
(2) §§ 7–203 and 7–512.1 of the Public Utilities Article.
(b) The Comptroller shall announce the tax– and fee–free period established
under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) (1) A person, including a public service company, is entitled to a refund for
any State tax or fee paid in error during the tax– and fee–free period established under
subsection (a) of this section.
(2) If a tax or fee paid in error during the tax– and fee–free period
established under subsection (a) of this section was collected by the Comptroller directly,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1536*

HOUSE BILL 1536
the Comptroller shall promptly issue a refund for the full amount of the tax or fee paid in
error.
(3) If a tax or fee paid in error during the tax– and fee–free period
established under subsection (a) of this section was collected for remittance to the
Comptroller by a public service company and not collected directly by the Comptroller, the
public service company shall promptly issue a refund for the full amount of the tax or fee
paid in error.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.